src/fst/stems/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
@P.Case.Ine@kräsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kräsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuivavõitu+A:kuiva%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kuklas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘uklas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kulla+A:kulla GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kullakaalu+A:kulla%#kaalu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kultiveerimata+A:kulʲtiv˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kumaras+A:kumaras GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kummis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ummis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kummuli+A:kummuli GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kuplas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘uplas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuradima+A:kuradima GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kurdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘urdus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kurvidega+A:k˘urvidega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kutsumata+A:k˘utsumata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@kutu+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@kutʲu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuulmiseta+A:k˘uulmiseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kuurdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘uurdus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kõhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kõhevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõhkvel+A:k˘õhkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõhnavõitu+A:kõhna%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kõmmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘õmmis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõnelemata+A:kõnelemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõrini+A:kõrini GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
kõrvalekalletega+A:kõrvale%#kalletega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõvavõitu+A:kõva%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõveraks+A:kõveraks GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõveras+A:kõveras GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kõõmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘õõmas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
käeraudus+A:k˘äe%#r˘audus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kägaras+A:kägaras GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
käharas+A:käharas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kähinaga+A:kähinaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@käkkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘äkkis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@käkras+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘äkras GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@käkrus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘äkrus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kämpus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ämpus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kängus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ängus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kännis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ännis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kärnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ärnas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kärssus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ärssus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
käänakutega+A:käänakutega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kääris+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ääris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@könksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘önksus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@köntis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘önʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kössakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kösʲsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kössis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ösʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@köögakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@köögakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@köökus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘öökus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@köötsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@köötsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@köötsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘öötsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kühmus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ühmus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
külmavõitu+A:külma%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
küsimata+A:küsimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kütkes+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ütkes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@küürakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@küürakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@küürus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘üürus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@küütsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@küütsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@küütsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘üütsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@laabakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@laabakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@laatsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@laatsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lahendamata+A:lahendamata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
laiavõitu+A:laia%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
laiduväärt+A:laidu%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@laokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘aokil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
lastetoata+A:laste%#t˘oata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@latsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@latsakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lausärkvel+A:l˘aus%#˘ärkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
leebuseta+A:l˘eebuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lehes+A:@P.Case.Ine@lehes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lehtedeta+A:l˘ehtedeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lehtes+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ehtes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lehtimata+A:l˘ehtimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lemmel+A:lemmel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lennuga+A:lennuga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lidukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lidukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@lidus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
liialdamata+A:liialdamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
liiast+A:liiast GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
liivavärvi+A:liiva%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lillmustriga+A:l˘ill%#m˘ustriga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
linavärvi+A:lina%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lingus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ingus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
loata+A:l˘oata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lodakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lodevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lodus+A:@P.Case.Ine@lodus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
loginaga+A:loginaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lohakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lohakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lohkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ohkus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lokkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘okkis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ommis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@longus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ongus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lontis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘onʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@loodis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘oodʲis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
loogetega+A:loogetega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@loogus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘oogus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@loojas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘oojas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lookas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ookas GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@loppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘oppis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@losakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@losakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘osʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lotakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lotakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lotsis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘otʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ludus+A:@P.Case.Ine@ludʲus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lukkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ukkus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lukustamata+A:lukustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lumega+A:lumega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lumeta+A:lumeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lumikatteta+A:lumi%#k˘atteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpetamata+A:lõpetamata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõputa+A:lõputa GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lõõgas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘õõgas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbikaalumata+A:läbi%#k˘aalumata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbimõtlemata+A:läbi%#m˘õtlemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbisegamini+A:läbi%#segamini GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
läikega+A:l˘äikega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@längakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@längakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@längus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ängus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lääbakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lääbakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
läägevõitu+A:l˘ääge%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lääpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ääpas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lömakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lömakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lömmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ömmis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lösakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lösakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lössakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lössakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lössis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘ösʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lühikesevõitu+A:lühikese%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@lüngis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l˘üngis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mainimisväärt+A:m˘ainimis%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
maksakarva+A:maksa%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
maksuga+A:maksuga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
maksuta+A:maksuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@marraskil+A:@P.Case.Ine@marraskil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@marus+A:@P.Case.Ine@marus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
meelemõistuseta+A:meele%#m˘õistuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
meelemärkuseta+A:meele%#m˘ärkuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@mega+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@mega GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
mehemoodi+A:mehe%#m˘oodʲi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
meiesorti+A:meie%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
merekarva+A:mere%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
miinusmärgiga+A:miinus%#märgiga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
minusorti+A:minu%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
missorti+A:m˘is%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@molukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@molʲukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
monoküllastamata+A:mono%#küllastamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
moodi+A:m˘oodʲi GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@morssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m˘orssis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@mossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m˘osʲsis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
motiveerimata+A:motiv˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mugavuseta+A:mugavuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mullavärvi+A:mulla%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
muredeta+A:muredeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
murega+A:murega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@mures+A:@P.Case.Ine@mures GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@musklis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m˘usklis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mustakirju+A:musta%#k˘irju GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
mustriga+A:m˘ustriga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
muusikaandega+A:muusika%#˘andega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@mõlkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m˘õlʲkis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mõnudeta+A:mõnudeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mõradega+A:mõradega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mõruvõitu+A:mõru%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
mõtlemata+A:m˘õtlemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
märgistamata+A:märgistamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
märjavõitu+A:märja%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
määramata+A:m˘ääramata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
määratlemata+A:määratlemata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
mööda+A:m˘ööda GI  "weight: 5 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@naerukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@naerukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
naerul+A:naerul GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nahast+A:nahast GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
naitumiseas+A:n˘aitumis%#˘eas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@naksis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘aksis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
napivõitu+A:napi%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
narrivõitu+A:narri%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nendesorti+A:nende%#s˘orti GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nigelavõitu+A:nigela%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
niiskevõitu+A:n˘iiske%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nimega+A:nimega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nipsis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘ipsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nisukarva+A:nisu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nohus+A:@P.Case.Ine@nohus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
noorevõitu+A:noore%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@norgus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘orgus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@normis+A:@P.Case.Ine@normis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@norus+A:@P.Case.Ine@norus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
norutujus+A:noru%#tujus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nukravõitu+A:n˘ukra%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nuppus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘uppus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nõres+A:@P.Case.Ine@nõres GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nõtkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘õtkus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
nägemata+A:nägemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nägemiseta+A:nägemiseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nägemisväärt+A:nägemis%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@näljas+A:@P.Case.Ine@nälʲjas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@närvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘ärvis GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nässis+A:@P.Case.Ine@näsʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@nässus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n˘ässus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Ine@ohus+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Ine@ohus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
olenemata+A:olenemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
omapärata+A:oma%#pärata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ootamata+A:˘ootamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ootusärevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘ootus%#ärevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
orasekarva+A:orase%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
osavuseta+A:osavuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
oskusega+A:˘oskusega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ostmata+A:˘ostmata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
otsustamata+A:otsustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Short@paaris+A:@P.Case.Short@p˘aaris GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
paganama+A:paganama GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@paistes+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘aistes GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
pakendamata+A:pakendamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
paksuvõitu+A:paksu%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@palges+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘alges GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
panemata+A:panemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@pankas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘ankas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@paokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘aokil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
peaga+A:p˘eaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
pealesunnitud+A:p˘eale%#sunʲnitud GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
peavarjuta+A:p˘ea%#varjuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
peenuseta+A:p˘eenuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@peetis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p˘eetis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@peidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@peidus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
